Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8006
Prompt payment act compliance statement; filing; effect; list available.

An insurer shall be exempt from the requirements of section 44-8005 during a calendar year when the insurer has a prompt payment act compliance statement on file with the director. Any insurer desiring to obtain the exemption shall file a prompt payment act compliance statement with the director not later than December 1 of the year prior to the exemption year. A list of insurers with prompt payment act compliance statements on file shall be publicly available from the director.

Laws 2005, LB 389, § 6.